Hawaii statutes.
[Part VII.] Neighborhood board

[§92-81] Neighborhood board; notice and
agenda; public input; quorum. (a) Any contrary provision in this chapter
notwithstanding, the provisions of this part shall apply to neighborhood boards
overseen by a neighborhood commission of the city and county of Honolulu,
and such other neighborhood boards as may be created in other counties and
overseen by a county-based commission.

(b) The agenda required to be included in
written public notice of a neighborhood board meeting may include an
opportunity for the board to receive public input on issues not specifically
noticed for consideration at the forthcoming meeting.

(c) Any matter raised as part of the public
input agenda allowed under subsection (b) may be discussed and information on
the matter may be received by the board at the meeting; provided that the board
shall not make a decision relating to the matter. The board may make decisions
on matters originally raised as part of a public input agenda only at a later meeting,
where the agenda for the meeting shall give notice of decision-making on the
matter.

(d) A quorum for a meeting of a neighborhood
board shall be required for:

(1) Conducting official board business;

(2) Discussions prior to and related to voting; and

(3) Voting required to validate an act of the board
as part of official board business.

A neighborhood board may receive information or testimony
on a matter of official board business without a quorum; provided that the
board shall not make a decision on the issue. The board members, at the next
meeting of the neighborhood board, shall report the matters presented as
information or testimony. [L 2008, c 153, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next